District of Columbia statutes.
42-3304

Penalties.

Any wilful or malicious violation of this chapter by any owner, agent, lessor, manager or any electric company, electricity supplier, gas company, or natural gas supplier shall be punishable by a fine of not more than $500 or imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both.

History

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-94, § 5, 27 DCR 3500
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 202(c), 47 DCR 1091
Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 20(c), 51 DCR 10549

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-544.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-107 in lieu of “utility company” substituted “electric company, electricity supplier, or gas company”.
D.C. Law 15-227 substituted “gas company, or natural gas supplier” for “or gas company”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 8(c) of Prevention of Unauthorized Switching of Customer Natural Gas Accounts Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-13, July 10, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 6589).